Massachusetts, session 194th, S3117.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding chapter 132B of the general laws or any other general or 
special law to the contrary, the Town of North Andover may by ordinance prohibit the 
application of second and first -generation anticoagulant rodenticides within the Town of North 
Andover, including application of such pesticides by licensed commercial applicators as defined 
in 333 C.M.R. 10.00. except as allowed by the Board of Health to remediate a public health 
condition. 
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.